Massachusetts, session 194th, H1713.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 209 of the General Laws, as so appearing, is hereby amended by
adding the following section:-
Section 39. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 38, a married woman may file a
petition with the court to terminate her husband’s parental rights pursuant to this section.
Grounds for the termination of parental rights shall be established if the court determines by
clear and convincing evidence that a child of the marriage was conceived as a result of an act of
rape made unlawful pursuant to sections 22 or 22A of chapter 265, or pursuant to a similar law
of another state, territory, possession, or Native American tribe where the offense occurred. It is
presumed that termination of parental rights is in the best interest of the child if the child was
conceived as a result of the unlawful sexual battery. A petition for termination of parental rights
of 2

under this paragraph may be filed at any time. The court shall accept a guilty plea or conviction
of unlawful sexual battery pursuant to said sections 22 or 22A of chapter 265 as conclusive proof
that the child was conceived by a violation of criminal law as set forth in this section.
SECTION 2. Chapter 209C of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2016 Official
Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after section 1 the following subsection:-
Section 1A. Notwithstanding section 10, the mother of a child who was born as a result of
an act of rape as set forth in this section may file a petition with the court to terminate the
perpetrator’s parental rights. Grounds for the termination of parental rights shall be established if
the court determines by clear and convincing evidence that the child was conceived as a result of
an act of rape made unlawful pursuant to sections 22 or 22A of chapter 265, or pursuant to a
similar law of another state, territory, possession, or Native American tribe where the offense
occurred. It is presumed that termination of parental rights is in the best interest of the child if the
child was conceived as a result of the unlawful sexual battery. A petition for termination of
parental rights under this paragraph may be filed at any time. The court shall accept a guilty plea
or conviction of unlawful sexual battery pursuant to said sections 22 or 22A of chapter 265 as
conclusive proof that the child was conceived by a violation of criminal law as set forth in this
section.
of 2